Louisiana, session 2026, HB945.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1289.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1289.2. Automobile repairs; insurers prohibition; liability transparency for repair
shops; insurer liability
A. For purposes of this Section, the following terms have the meanings
ascribed to them:
(1) "Steering" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 40:2870.
B. An insurer shall disclose all of the following to a policyholder:
(1) The right to choose his own repair shop and services.
(2) Preferred repair shops and services are optional.
C. An insurer is prohibited from all of the following;
(1) Offering incentives or discounts to policyholders for using preferred
shops.
(2) Requiring policyholders to use preferred repair shops or services.
(3) Steering policyholders towards preferred repair shops or service
providers.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1191 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 945
D.(1) A repair shop shall obtain written consent from policyholders before
using non-recommended parts or procedures.
(2) Repair shops shall disclose when Original Equipment Manufacturer parts
or non-standard procedures are used.
(3) A policyholder shall sign a release acknowledging the risks and accepting
liability for the use of such parts or procedures.
(4) If the insurer pressures the consumer into accepting substandard repairs,
liability for any resulting safety issues shall fall on the insurer.